North Carolina, session 2025, SB707.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. ALLOW LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS TO RETIRE WITH
UNREDUCED BENEFITS AFTER TWENTY-FIVE YEARS OF CREDITABLE
SERVICE
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 135-5(a)(4) reads as rewritten:
"(4) Any member who is a law-enforcement officer and who (i) attains age 50 and
completes 15 or more years of creditable service in this capacity, (ii) attains
age 55 and completes five or more years of creditable service in this capacity,
or (iii) has completed 25 years of creditable service with a minimum of 15
years of creditable service in a law enforcement capacity may retire upon
electronic submission or written application to the Board of Trustees setting
forth at what time, as of the first day of a calendar month, not less than one
day nor more than 120 days subsequent to the execution and filing thereof, the
member desires to be retired; Provided, also, any retired. Any member who
has met the conditions herein required but of this subsection, does not retire,
and later becomes a teacher or an employee other than as a law-enforcement
officer shall continue to have the right to commence retirement."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 135-5(b21) reads as rewritten:
"(b21) Service Retirement Allowance of Members Retiring on or After July 1, 2019. 2019,
and Before January 1, 2026. – Upon retirement from service on or after July 1, 2019, and before
January 1, 2026, in accordance with subsection (a) or (a1) of this section, a member shall receive
the following service retirement allowance:
…."
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 135-5 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(b22) Service Retirement Allowance of Members Retiring on or After January 1, 2026. –
Upon retirement from service on or after January 1, 2026, in accordance with subsection (a) or
(a1) of this section, a member shall receive the following service retirement allowance:
*S707-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) A member who is a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law
enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as
follows:
a. If the member's service retirement date occurs (i) on or after the
member's 55th birthday and completion of five years of creditable
service as a law enforcement officer or (ii) after the completion of 25
years of creditable service, then the allowance shall be equal to one
and eighty-two hundredths percent (1.82%) of the member's average
final compensation multiplied by the number of years of the member's
creditable service.
b. If the member's service retirement date occurs (i) on or after the
member's 50th birthday and before the member's 55th birthday and (ii)
after the completion of 15 or more years of creditable service as a law
enforcement officer but before the completion of 25 years of creditable
service, then the retirement allowance shall be equal to the greater of
the following amounts:
1. The service retirement allowance payable under
sub-subdivision a. of this subdivision reduced by one-third of
one percent (1/3 of 1%) thereof for each month by which the
retirement date precedes the first day of the month coincident
with, or next following, the month the member would have
attained age 55.
2. The service retirement allowance as computed under
sub-subdivision a. of this subdivision reduced by five percent
(5%) times the difference between 25 years and the amount of
creditable service at retirement.
(2) A member who is not a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law
enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as
follows:
a. If the member's service retirement date occurs (i) on or after the
member's 65th birthday and completion of five years of membership
service, (ii) after the completion of 30 years of creditable service, or
(iii) on or after the member's 60th birthday and completion of 25 years
of creditable service, then the allowance shall be equal to one and
eighty-two hundredths percent (1.82%) of the member's average final
compensation, multiplied by the number of years of creditable service.
b. If the member's service retirement date occurs (i) after the member's
60th birthday and before the member's 65th birthday and (ii) prior to
the completion of 25 years or more of creditable service, then the
retirement allowance is the amount of the retirement allowance in
sub-subdivision a. of this subdivision reduced by one-quarter of one
percent (1/4 of 1%) thereof for each month by which the retirement
date precedes the first day of the month coincident with, or next
following, the member's 65th birthday.
c. If the member's early service retirement date occurs (i) on or after the
member's 50th birthday and before the member's 60th birthday and (ii)
after completion of 20 years of creditable service but prior to the
completion of 30 years of creditable service, then the early service
retirement allowance shall be equal to the greater of the following
amounts:
Page 2 Senate Bill 707-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
1. The amount of the service retirement allowance as computed
under sub-subdivision a. of this subdivision reduced by the
sum of five-twelfths of one percent (5/12 of 1%) thereof for
each month by which the member's retirement date precedes
the first day of the month coincident with, or next following,
the month the member would have attained age 60, plus
one-quarter of one percent (1/4 of 1%) thereof for each month
by which the member's 60th birthday precedes the first day of
the month coincident with, or next following, the member's
65th birthday.
2. The amount of the service retirement allowance as computed
under sub-subdivision a. of this subdivision reduced by five
percent (5%) times the difference between 30 years and the
amount of creditable service at retirement.
3. If the member's creditable service commenced prior to July 1,
1994, the service retirement allowance equal to the actuarial
equivalent of the allowance payable at the age of 60 years as
computed in sub-subdivision b. of this subdivision.
d. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this subsection, any
member whose creditable service commenced prior to July 1, 1963,
shall not receive less than the benefit provided by subsection (b) of this
section."
SECTION 1.(d) G.S. 135-5(m) reads as rewritten:
"(m) Survivor's Alternate Benefit. – Upon the death of a member in service, the beneficiary
designated to receive a return of accumulated contributions shall have the right to elect to receive
in lieu thereof the reduced retirement allowance provided by Option 2 of subsection (g) above of
this section computed by assuming that the member had retired on the first day of the month
following the date of the member's death, provided that all four of the following conditions apply:
(1) The member falls into one of the following categories:
a. The member had attained such age and/or the minimum age, creditable
service amount, or combination of both necessary to be eligible to
commence retirement with an early or service retirement allowance,
orallowance.
b. The member had obtained 20 years of creditable service in which case
the retirement allowance shall be computed in accordance with
G.S. 135-5(b21)(1)c. or G.S. 135-5(b21)(2)c., sub-subdivision
(b22)(1)b. or sub-subdivision (b22)(2)c. of this section
notwithstanding the requirement of obtaining age 50, or50.
…."
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 128-27(a)(5) reads as rewritten:
"(5) Any member who is a law enforcement officer and who (i) attains age 50 and
completes 15 or more years of creditable service in this capacity, or (ii) attains
age 55 and completes five or more years of creditable service in this capacity,
or (iii) who has completed 25 years of creditable service with a minimum of
15 years of creditable service in a law enforcement capacity may retire upon
electronic submission or written application to the Board of Trustees setting
forth at what time, as of the first day of a calendar month, not less than one
day nor more than 120 days subsequent to the execution and filing thereof, the
member desires to be retired; provided, also, any retired. Any member who
has met the conditions required by this subdivision but does not retire, and
Senate Bill 707-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
later becomes an employee other than as a law enforcement officer, continues
to have the right to commence retirement."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 128-27(b22) reads as rewritten:
"(b22) Service Retirement Allowance of Member Retiring on or After July 1, 2019. 2019,
and Before January 1, 2026. – Upon retirement from service in accordance with subsection (a)
or (a1) of this section, on or after July 1, 2019, and before January 1, 2026, a member shall
receive the following service retirement allowance:
…."
SECTION 2.(c) G.S. 128-27 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(b23) Service Retirement Allowance of Member Retiring on or After January 1, 2026. –
Upon retirement from service in accordance with subsection (a) or (a1) of this section, on or after
January 1, 2026, a member shall receive the following service retirement allowance:
(1) A member who is a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law
enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as
follows:
a. If the member's service retirement date occurs (i) on or after the
member's 55th birthday and completion of five years of creditable
service as a law enforcement officer or (ii) after the completion of 25
years of creditable service, then the allowance shall be equal to one
and eighty-five hundredths percent (1.85%) of the member's average
final compensation multiplied by the number of years of the member's
creditable service.
b. If the member's service retirement date occurs (i) on or after the
member's 50th birthday and before the member's 55th birthday and (ii)
after the completion of 15 or more years of creditable service as a law
enforcement officer but before the completion of 25 years of creditable
service, then the retirement allowance shall be equal to the greater of
the following amounts:
1. The service retirement allowance payable under
sub-subdivision a. of this subdivision reduced by one-third of
one percent (1/3 of 1%) thereof for each month by which the
retirement date precedes the first day of the month coincident
with, or next following, the month the member would have
attained age 55.
2. The service retirement allowance as computed under
sub-subdivision a. of this subdivision reduced by five percent
(5%) times the difference between 25 years and the amount of
creditable service at retirement.
(2) A member who is not a law enforcement officer or an eligible law enforcement
officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:
a. If the member's service retirement date occurs (i) on or after the
member's 65th birthday and the completion of five years of creditable
service, (ii) after the completion of 30 years of creditable service, or
(iii) on or after the member's 60th birthday and the completion of 25
years of creditable service, then the allowance shall be equal to one
and eighty-five hundredths percent (1.85%) of the member's average
final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of creditable
service.
b. If the member's service retirement date occurs (i) after the member's
60th birthday and before the member's 65th birthday and (ii) prior to
the completion of 25 years or more of creditable service, then the
Page 4 Senate Bill 707-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
retirement allowance is the amount of the retirement allowance in
sub-subdivision a. of this subdivision reduced by one-quarter of one
percent (1/4 of 1%) thereof for each month by which the retirement
date precedes the first day of the month coincident with, or next
following, the member's 65th birthday.
c. If the member's early service retirement date occurs (i) on or after the
member's 50th birthday and before the member's 60th birthday and (ii)
after completion of 20 years of creditable service but prior to the
completion of 30 years of creditable service, then the early service
retirement allowance shall be equal to the greater of the following
amounts:
1. The amount of the service retirement allowance as computed
under sub-subdivision a. of this subdivision reduced by the
sum of five-twelfths of one percent (5/12 of 1%) thereof for
each month by which the retirement date precedes the first day
of the month coincident with, or next following, the month the
member would have attained age 60, plus one-quarter of one
percent (1/4 of 1%) thereof for each month by which the
member's 60th birthday precedes the first day of the month
coincident with, or next following, the member's 65th birthday.
2. The amount of the service retirement allowance as computed
under sub-subdivision a. of this subdivision reduced by five
percent (5%) times the difference between 30 years and the
amount of creditable service at retirement.
3. If the member's creditable service commenced prior to July 1,
1995, the amount of the actuarial equivalent of the allowance
payable at the age of 60 years as computed in sub-subdivision
b. of this subdivision.
d. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, any member whose
creditable service commenced prior to July 1, 1965, shall not receive
less than the benefit provided by subsection (b) of this section."
SECTION 2.(d) G.S. 128-27(m) reads as rewritten:
"(m) Survivor's Alternate Benefit. – Upon the death of a member in service, the beneficiary
designated to receive a return of accumulated contributions shall have the right to elect to receive
in lieu thereof the reduced retirement allowance provided by Option two of subsection (g) above
of this section computed by assuming that the member had retired on the first day of the month
following the date of the member's death, provided that all four of the following conditions apply:
(1) The member falls into one of the following categories:
a. The member had attained such age and/or the minimum age, creditable
service amount, or combination of both necessary to be eligible to
commence retirement with an early or service retirement allowance,
orallowance.
b. The member had obtained 20 years of creditable service in which case
the retirement allowance shall be computed in accordance with
G.S. 128-27(b22)(1)c. or G.S. 128-27(b22)(2)c., sub-subdivision
(b23)(1)b. or sub-subdivision (b23)(2)c. of this section,
notwithstanding the requirement of obtaining age 50, or50.
…."
SECTION 3.(a) This Part applies to law enforcement officers retiring on or after
January 1, 2026.
Senate Bill 707-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3.(b) Subsections (a) and (d) of Section 1 and subsections (a) and (d) of
Section 2 of this Part become effective January 1, 2026. The remainder of this Part is effective
when it becomes law.

PART II. CONFORMING CHANGES
SECTION 4.(a) G.S. 143-166.41 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-166.41. Special separation allowance.allowance options for State law enforcement
officers.
(a) Annual Special Separation Allowance. – Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
every sworn law-enforcement officer as defined by G.S. 135-1(11c) or G.S. 143-166.30(a)(4)
employed by a State department, agency, or institution who qualifies under this section shall
receive, receive an annual special separation allowance beginning in the month in which he the
officer retires on a basic service retirement under the provisions of G.S. 135-5(a), an annual
separation allowance equal to eighty-five hundredths percent (0.85%) of the annual equivalent
of the base rate of compensation most recently applicable to him for each year of creditable
service. employer. To qualify for the allowance the officer shall:
(1) Have (i) completed 30 or more years of creditable service or, (ii) have attained
55 years of age and completed five or more years of creditable service; and
(2) Not have attained 62 years of age; and
(3) Have completed at least five years of continuous service as a law enforcement
officer as herein defined immediately preceding a service retirement. Any
break in the continuous service required by this subsection because of
disability retirement or disability salary continuation benefits shall not
adversely affect an officer's qualification to receive the allowance, provided
the officer returns to service within 45 days after the disability benefits cease
and is otherwise qualified to receive the allowance.G.S. 135-5(a).
…
(b) As used in this section, "creditable service" means the Definitions. – The following
definitions apply in this section:
(1) Allowance. – The annual special separation allowance for State law
enforcement officers provided for under this section.
(2) Creditable service. – The service for which credit is allowed under the
retirement system of which the officer is a member, provided that at least fifty
percent (50%) of the service is as a law enforcement officer as herein defined
or as a probation/parole officer as defined in G.S. 135-1(17a).member.
(3) Law enforcement officer. – As defined in either G.S. 135-1 or
G.S. 143-166.30(a).
(4) Officer. – A law enforcement officer.
(5) Probation/parole officer. – As defined in G.S. 135-1.
(b1) Eligibility for Allowance. – To be eligible for an allowance under this section, an
officer is required to meet all of the following criteria:
(1) The officer (i) has completed 25 or more years of creditable service or (ii) is
55 years of age or older and has completed five or more years of creditable
service.
(2) The officer is less than 62 years of age.
(3) The officer has completed at least five years of continuous service as a law
enforcement officer immediately preceding the officer's service retirement.
Any break in this required continuous service that is a result of disability
retirement or disability salary continuation benefits shall not adversely affect
an officer's qualification to receive an allowance under this subdivision so
Page 6 Senate Bill 707-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
long as the officer returned to service within 45 days after the disability
benefits had ceased and is otherwise qualified to receive the allowance.
(4) At least fifty percent (50%) of the officer's creditable service is as a law
enforcement officer, or for service prior to July 1, 2017, as a probation/parole
officer.
(b2) Allowance Amount. – The amount of the allowance under this section is equal to
eighty-five hundredths percent (0.85%) of the annual equivalent of the base rate of compensation
most recently applicable to the officer for each year of creditable service.
(c) Cessation of Payment. – Payment of the allowance to a retired officer under the
provisions of this section shall cease at the first of:occurrence of one of the following:
(1) The death of the officer;officer.
(2) The last day of the month in which the officer attains 62 years of age; orage.
(3) The first day of reemployment by any State department, agency, or institution,
except that this subdivision does not apply to an officer returning to State
employment in a position exempt from the North Carolina Human Resources
Act in an agency other than the agency from which that officer retired.
(d) Impact of Other Benefits or Actions. – This section does not affect the benefits to
which an individual may be entitled from State, federal, or private retirement systems. The
benefits payable under this section shall not be subject to any increases in salary or retirement
allowances that may be authorized by the General Assembly for employees of the State or retired
employees of the State.
(e) Eligibility Determinations. – The head of each State department, agency, or institution
shall determine the eligibility of employees for the benefits provided herein.under this section.
(f) Transfer of Funds. – The Director of the Budget may authorize from time to time the
transfer of funds within the budgets of each State department, agency, or institution necessary to
carry out the purposes of this Article. section. These funds shall be taken from those funds
appropriated to the department, agency, or institution for salaries and related fringe benefits.
(g) Responsibility for Payment. – The head of each State department, agency, or
institution shall make the payments set forth in subsection (a) this section to those persons
certified under subsection (e) of this section from funds available under subsection (f).(f) of this
section. The allowance shall be paid in equal installments on the payroll frequency used by the
employer from which the officer retired."
SECTION 4.(b) G.S. 143-166.42 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-166.42. Special separation allowances for local law enforcement officers.
(a) Annual Special Separation Allowance. – On and after January 1, 1987, every sworn
law enforcement officer as defined by G.S. 128-21(11d) or G.S. 143-166.50(a)(3) employed by
a local government employer who qualifies under this section shall receive, receive an annual
special separation allowance beginning in the month in which the officer retires on a basic service
retirement under the provisions of G.S. 128-27(a), an annual separation allowance equal to
eighty-five hundredths percent (0.85%) of the annual equivalent of the base rate of compensation
most recently applicable to the officer for each year of creditable service. The allowance shall be
paid in equal installments on the payroll frequency used by the employer. G.S. 128-27(a).
(a1) Eligibility for Allowance. – To qualify for the allowance, the officer shall:shall meet
all of the following criteria:
(1) Have The officer has (i) completed 30 25 or more years of creditable service
or (ii) have attained is 55 years of age or older and has completed five or more
years of creditable service; andservice.
(2) Not have attained The officer is less than 62 years of age; andage.
(3) Have The officer has completed at least five years of continuous service as a
law enforcement officer as herein defined immediately preceding a service
retirement. Any break in the this required continuous service required by this
Senate Bill 707-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
subsection because that is a result of disability retirement or disability salary
continuation benefits shall not adversely affect an officer's qualification to
receive the allowance, provided the officer returns to service within 45 days
after the disability benefits cease and is otherwise qualified to receive the
allowance.
(4) At least fifty percent (50%) of the officer's creditable service is as a law
enforcement officer.
(b) As used in this section, "creditable service" means the service Definitions. – The
following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Allowance. – The annual special separation allowance for local law
enforcement officers provided for under this section.
(2) Creditable service. – The service for which credit is allowed under the
retirement system of which the officer is a member, provided that at least fifty
percent (50%) of the service is as a law enforcement officer as herein
defined.member.
(3) Law enforcement officer. – As defined in G.S. 128-21 or G.S. 143-166.50(a).
(4) Officer. – Law enforcement officer.
(b1) Allowance Amount. – The amount of the allowance under this section is equal to
eighty-five hundredths percent (0.85%) of the annual equivalent of the base rate of compensation
most recently applicable to the officer for each year of creditable service.
(c) Cessation of Payment. – Payment of the allowance to a retired officer under the
provisions of this section shall cease at the first of:occurrence of any of the following:
(1) The death of the officer;officer.
(2) The last day of the month in which the officer attains 62 years of age; orage.
(3) The first day of reemployment by a local government employer in any
capacity.employer, except that this subdivision does not apply to a retired
officer returning to local government employment in any of the following
circumstances:
a. The retired officer is reemployed in service to a county board of
elections on an election day or during the hours for early voting under
Part 5 of Article 14A of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes in a
capacity that complies with G.S. 128-21(19) and does not result in
cessation or suspension of the retiree's benefit from the Local
Governmental Employees' Retirement System.
b. The retired officer is reemployed in a public safety position in a
capacity not requiring participation in the Local Governmental
Employees' Retirement System or an equivalent locally sponsored
retirement plan.
(c1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (3) of subsection (c) of this section,
payments to a retired officer shall not cease when a local government employer employs a retired
officer or any of the following:
(1) In a public safety position in a capacity not requiring participation in the Local
Governmental Employees' Retirement System.
(2) In service to a county board of elections on an election day or during the hours
for early voting under Part 5 of Article 14A of Chapter 163 of the General
Statutes in a capacity that complies with G.S. 128-21(19) and does not result
in cessation or suspension of the retiree's benefit from the Local Government
Employees' Retirement System.
(d) Impact of Other Benefits or Actions. – This section does not affect the benefits to
which an individual may be entitled from State, local, federal, or private retirement systems. The
benefits payable under this section shall not be subject to any increases in salary or retirement
Page 8 Senate Bill 707-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
allowances that may be authorized by local government employers or for retired employees of
local governments.
(e) Eligibility Determinations. – The governing body of each local employer shall
determine the eligibility of employees for the benefits provided herein.under this section.
(f) Responsibility for Payment. – The governing body of each local employer shall make
the payments set forth in subsection (a) of this section to those persons certified under subsection
(e) of this section from funds available. The allowance shall be paid in equal installments on the
payroll frequency used by the employer from which the officer retired."
SECTION 4.(c) This section is effective January 1, 2026, and applies to law
enforcement officers retiring on or after that date.

PART III. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 5. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Senate Bill 707-First Edition Page 9